Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.130

Orders—When effective—Stay.

An order pursuant to proceedings authorized by this chapter, after due notice and findings in accordance with this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, or an order of summary suspension entered under this chapter, shall take effect immediately upon its being served. The order, if appealed to the court, shall not be stayed pending the appeal unless the disciplining authority or court to which the appeal is taken enters an order staying the order of the disciplining authority, which stay shall provide for terms necessary to protect the public.

[ 1986 c 259 s 7; 1984 c 279 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.